Utah statutes.
53A-8a-501.   Local school board to establish dismissal procedures.

(1)  A local school board shall, by contract with its employees or their associations, or by resolution of the board, establish procedures for dismissal of employees in an orderly manner without discrimination.

(2)  The procedures shall include:

(a)  standards of due process;

(b)  causes for dismissal; and

(c)  procedures and standards related to developing and implementing a plan of assistance for a career employee whose performance is unsatisfactory.

(3)  Procedures and standards for a plan of assistance adopted under Subsection (2)(c) shall require a plan of assistance to identify:

(a)  specific, measurable, and actionable deficiencies;

(b)  the available resources provided for improvement; and

(c)  a course of action to improve employee performance.

